Utah statutes.
63A-5-207.   Availability of appropriated funds -- Excessive obligations prohibited -- Exceptions.

(1)  The director shall assure, unless otherwise specifically instructed by the terms of the appropriation of a particular project, that no obligations beyond the authorized funding are incurred in the construction of any project authorized by the Legislature.

(2)  The director may consent to the drafting of a plan or the awarding of a contract that will exceed in cost the funding currently available for the project in question only if the Legislature has specifically provided for extending construction of a building or the completion of a project into future fiscal periods.



Amended by Chapter 231, 2000 General Session

